dictsource/tdt_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded
// Spelling-to-phoneme rules for Tetun Dili. This assumes inconsistent spelling, ignores glottals, accepts Portuguese, Indonesian and English spelling where it doesn’t conflict with Tetun (e.g. for “q”, “ff”. Double vowels convert to stressed vowels.
// Letter groups (for Portuguese rules)
// A  a vowel
// B  a consonant, except h l r w y
// C  a consonant
// G  a voiced consonant
// K  not a vowel
// D  a digit
// _ beginning or end of word

// endings
.L01 a am
.L02 e em

.group a
        a        a
        aa       ''a
        ae       aE
        ai       aI
        ao       aO
        au       au
.group á // Stressed vowel
        á        ''a
.group à // Portuguese
        à        ''a
.group ã // Portuguese
        ã          aN
        ão         auN

.group b
        b        b

.group c // Portuguese
     _) c (_       se
        c          k
        c (Y       s         // ce ci
        c (B       ki
        c (s       k
        c (t       k
        c (_C      k_
        ch         S
        chr        kr
        ck         k
       c (c               //drop “c” (eg: seleccionar)
   A) ct         t         //drop “c” (eg: exacto)
   A) cç         s         //drop “c” in European Portuguese (eg: selecção)
 conta) ct (A      kt        // eg: contacto, contactar, contactável, incontactável, etc...

.group d
        d        d

.group e
        e        E
        ea       Ea
        ee       ''E
        ei       ei
        eo       EO
        eu       eu
        _) e (_      i // Portuguese “and”
.group é
        é        ''E
.group ê
        ê          ''e
        êm (_      ''eIN
        êm (C      ''eIm
        ên (K      ''eIN
        ênh        ''en^
        êu         ''eu

.group f
        f        f
        ff       f //English

.group g
_) g (_       ge
       g          g
        g (g
        gu (Y      g
     a) gu (ent    gw
 _alca) gue (t     gwe
_apazi) gu (e      gw
_apazí) gu (e      gw
   _ar) gu (i      gw
 averi) gu (e      gw
 bilin) gu (A      gw
 _biri) gu (i_     gw
  enxa) gu (e      gw
  enxá) gu (L02_   gw
     i) gu (idade  gw
  _lin) gu (A      gw
   lin) gu (i      gw
  _min) gu (e      gw
  _pin) gu (im_    gw
  _pin) gu (ins_   gw
_redar) gu (A      gw
   _sa) gu (i      gw
   san) gu (ín     gw
   san) gu (in     gw
  stin) gu (A      gw
   _un) gu (ento_  gw
  xtin) gu (A      gw
n) gu (A      gw        // eg: língua, etc.
man) gu (ei     g         // mangueira
gu (ém_    g         // eg: alguém, ninguém, etc...


.group h
        h        h // Will pronounce even in Portuguese words

.group i
        i        i
        ia       ia
        ie       ie
        ii       ''i
        io       io
        iu       iu
        im (_      iN // Portuguese
        im (C      im
        in (g      iN
        in (k      iN
        inh        in^
.group í
        í        ''i

.group j
        j        Z

.group k
        k        k

.group l
        l        l
        ll       l^ // INL
        lh       l^ // Portuguese
        ly       lj // Rare

.group m
        m        m
     A) mm (A       m // English

.group n
        n        n
        nn       n // “connosco”
        ng       N // English, Indonesian
        nh       n^
        ny       n^
.group ñ // INL
        ñ       n^

.group o
        o        o
        oa       Oa
        oe       oe
        oi       oi
        oo       ''O
        ou       ou
        _) os (_      us // Portuguese
        _) os (_A     uz // Portuguese
        om (_      oN // Portuguese
.group ó
        ó       ''O // Portuguese
.group ô  // Portuguese
        ô          ''o
        ôm (_      ''oN
        ôm (C      ''om
        ôn (K      ''oN
        ônh        ''on^
.group õ // Portuguese
        õ          oi
        õe         oin

.group p
        p        p
     A) pp (A       p // English
        ph       f // English

.group q // Portuguese
     _) q (_       ke
        q          k
        qu         kw
        qü         kw
        qu (Y      k
        qu (K      ku
     _) que        ke        // quente, etc.
     _) quei (C    k'eI      // queira, queima, etc
     @) quên       kw'eIN    // frequência, etc.
   ade) qu (e      kw
     A) qu (idade_ kw
    _a) qu (ífero_ kw
     e) qu (estr   kw
    _e) qu (in     kw
   exe) qu (AC     kw
   fre) qu (ent    kw
    lo) qu (en     kw
     n) qu (en     kw
     _) qu (inquAn kw
     _) qu (inquag kw
   _se) qu (el     kw
    se) qu (en     kw
  tran) qu (il     kw
        queç       kes       // esqueça.
     A) que (nA_   ke        // pequeno, etc.
     C) quê (_     ke        // porquê, etc.
        que (l     ke        // aquele, etc.
        que (r_    kE        // qualquer, etc.
        qui        ki        // quinta, esquilo, etc.
     _) qu (inde   ku        // quindecágono, etc.
     _) quo        kuo       // quoficiente, etc.

.group r
        r        r
        rr       r

.group s
        s        s
        ss       s // Portuguese
        ss         s // Portuguese
        sc (Y      s // Portuguese
        sç         s // Portuguese
        sh         S // English
        sj       C // Indonesian
     A) s (C       s // Portuguese
     A) ss         s
     A) s (G+      Z
     A) s (_KS1    s
     A) s (_G+S1   Z
        s (G       z
        s (w+      s
        sr         zx
     _) sobre (@P5 sobre
  tran) s (A       z
 _trân) s (ito_    z
  _sub) s (ist     z
        ssion (_   _^_EN

.group t
        t        t
        tt       t // English
        th         _^_EN // English
        tion (_    _^_EN // English

.group u
        u        u
        ua       ua
        ue       ue
        ui       ui
        uo       uo
        uu       ''u
        um (_      uN // Portuguese
.group ú
        ú        ''u

.group v
        v        v

.group w
        w        w

.group x
        x          S
        x (_       ks // Portuguese

.group y
        y        j

.group z
        z        z
   _pi) zz (a      ts // pizza..

.group
        ç          s
	)A ' (A		//Ignore glottal stop between two vowels
	)A ’ (A		//Ignore glottal stop between two vowels

// Reading maths
        , (D       v'irgula
    D_) , (_D      v'irgula
    D_) . (_D      p'ontu
    __) - (_D      m'enus
    D_) - (_D      m'enus
    D_) / (_D      divid'irp'or		// For laws want 'bara'
    D_) * (_D      v'ezes
//    A_) - (_D      _              What do these 2 lines do?
//    C_) - (_D      _
